Vermont, session 2025-2026, H726.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 309 is amended to read:
§ 309. FLEXIBLE WORKING ARRANGEMENTS
(a)(1) An employee may request a flexible working arrangement that meets
the needs of the employer and employee. The employer shall consider a
request using the procedures in subsections (b) and (c) of this section at least
twice per calendar year.
(2) As used in this section, “flexible working arrangement” means
intermediate or long-term changes in the employee’s regular working
arrangements, including changes in the number of days or hours worked,
changes in the time the employee arrives at or departs from work, work from
VT LEG #386026 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.726
2026 Page 2 of 3
home, or job-sharing. “Flexible working arrangement” does not include
vacation, routine scheduling of shifts, or another form of employee leave.
(b)(1) The employer shall discuss the request for a flexible working
arrangement with the employee in good faith. The employer and employee
may propose alternative arrangements during the discussion.
(2) The employer shall consider the employee’s request for a flexible
working arrangement and whether shall grant the request could be granted in a
manner that in the event the request is not inconsistent with its business
operations or its legal or contractual obligations.
(3) As used in this section, “inconsistent with business operations”
includes:
(A) the burden on an employer of additional costs;
(B) a detrimental effect on aggregate employee morale unrelated to
discrimination or other unlawful employment practices;
(C) a detrimental effect on the ability of an employer to meet
consumer demand;
(D) an inability to reorganize work among existing staff;
(E) an inability to recruit additional staff;
(F) a detrimental impact on business quality or business performance;
(G) an insufficiency of work during the periods the employee
proposes to work; and
VT LEG #386026 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.726
2026 Page 3 of 3
(H) planned structural changes to the business.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386026 v.1